Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1205
Recall petition; political subdivision; pay costs.

A political subdivision in which a recall petition is issued, a recall election is held, an official is recalled, or a vacancy needs to be filled as the result of a recall petition shall pay the costs of the recall procedure and any special election held as a result of a recall election. If a recall election is canceled pursuant to section 32-1306, the political subdivision shall be responsible for costs incurred related to the canceled election. The costs shall include all chargeable costs as provided in section 32-1202 associated with preparing for and conducting a recall or special election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 370;

Laws 2008, LB312, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 52.